Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6598XS (2) 91 ms/js S.F. 2333 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 355.15 Land surveyors. 1 A county shall not impose on a land surveyor to survey land 2 in the county any requirements in addition to those required 3 for licensure pursuant to chapter 542B, including any bonds, 4 additional fees, or additional permits. 5